Utah statutes.
58-16a-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  Each applicant for licensure as an optometrist shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the division under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d) (i)  be a doctoral graduate of a recognized school of optometry accredited by:

(A)  a regional accrediting body recognized by the Council on Post-Secondary Education; and

(B)  the American Optometric Association's Council on Optometric Education; or

(ii)  be a graduate of a school of optometry located outside the United States that meets the criteria that would qualify the school for accreditation under Subsection (1)(d)(i), as demonstrated by the applicant for licensure;

(e)  if the applicant graduated from a recognized school of optometry prior to July 1, 1996, have successfully completed a course of study satisfactory to the division, in consultation with the board, in general and ocular pharmacology and emergency medical care;

(f)  have passed examinations approved by the division in consultation with the board that include:

(i)  a standardized national optometry examination;

(ii)  a standardized clinical examination;

(iii)  a standardized national therapeutics examination; and

(iv)  the Utah Optometry Law Examination; and

(g)  meet with the board and representatives of the division, if requested by either party, for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

(2)  An applicant for licensure as an optometrist qualifying under the endorsement provision of Section 58-1-302 shall:

(a)  be currently licensed in good standing in any state of the United States; and

(b)  have been actively engaged in the legal practice of optometry for not less than 3,200 hours in the immediately preceding two years, in a manner that is consistent with the legal practice of optometry in this state.

